Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Subpart 1 Default and Enforcement of Security Interest

11-9-601.
Rights after default; judicial enforcement; consignor or buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes.

Rights of secured party after default.After default, a secured party has the rights provided in this part and, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-602, those provided by agreement of the parties. A secured party:

May reduce a claim to judgment, foreclose, or otherwise enforce the claim, security interest, or agricultural lien by any available judicial procedure; and

If the collateral is documents, may proceed either as to the documents or as to the goods they cover.

Rights and duties of secured party in possession or control.A secured party in possession of collateral or control of collateral under Code Section 11-9-104, 11-9-105, 11-9-106, or 11-9-107 has the rights and duties provided in Code Section 11-9-207.

Rights cumulative; simultaneous exercise.The rights under subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section are cumulative and may be exercised simultaneously.

Rights of debtor and obligor.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this Code section and Code Section 11-9-605, after default, a debtor and an obligor have the rights provided in this part and by agreement of the parties.

Lien of levy after judgment.If a secured party has reduced its claim to judgment, the lien of any levy that may be made upon the collateral by virtue of an execution based upon the judgment relates back to the earliest of:

The date of perfection of the security interest or agricultural lien in the collateral;

The date of filing a financing statement covering the collateral; or

Any date specified in a statute under which the agricultural lien was created.

Execution sale.A sale pursuant to an execution is a foreclosure of the security interest or agricultural lien by judicial procedure within the meaning of this Code section. A secured party may purchase at the sale and thereafter hold the collateral free of any other requirements of this article.

Consignor or buyer of certain rights to payment.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-607, this part imposes no duties upon a secured party that is a consignor or is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-601, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-602.
Waiver and variance of rights and duties.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-624, to the extent that they give rights to a debtor or obligor and impose duties on a secured party, the debtor or obligor may not waive or vary the rules stated in the following listed sections:

Subparagraph (b)(4)(C) of Code Section 11-9-207, which deals with use and operation of the collateral by the secured party;

Code Section 11-9-210, which deals with requests for an accounting and requests concerning a list of collateral and statement of account;

Subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-607, which deals with collection and enforcement of collateral;

Subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-608 and subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-615 to the extent that they deal with application or payment of noncash proceeds of collection, enforcement, or disposition;

Subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-608 and subsection (d) of Code Section 11-9-615 to the extent that they require accounting for or payment of surplus proceeds of collateral;

Code Section 11-9-609 to the extent that it imposes upon a secured party that takes possession of collateral without judicial process the duty to do so without breach of the peace;

Subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-610 and Code Sections 11-9-611, 11-9-613, and 11-9-614, which deal with disposition of collateral;

Subsection (f) of Code Section 11-9-615, which deals with calculation of a deficiency or surplus when a disposition is made to the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor;

Code Section 11-9-616, which deals with explanation of the calculation of a surplus or deficiency;

Code Sections 11-9-620, 11-9-621, and 11-9-622, which deal with acceptance of collateral in satisfaction of obligation;

Code Section 11-9-623, which deals with redemption of collateral;

Code Section 11-9-624, which deals with permissible waivers; and

Code Sections 11-9-625 and 11-9-626, which deal with the secured party’s liability for failure to comply with this article.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-602, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-603.
Agreement on standards concerning rights and duties.

Agreed standards.The parties may determine by agreement the standards measuring the fulfillment of the rights of a debtor or obligor and the duties of a secured party under a rule stated in Code Section 11-9-602 if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

Agreed standards inapplicable to breach of peace.Subsection (a) of this Code section does not apply to the duty under Code Section 11-9-609 to refrain from breaching the peace.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-603, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-604.
Procedure if security agreement covers real property or fixtures.

Enforcement; personal and real property.If a security agreement covers both personal and real property, a secured party may proceed:

Under this part as to the personal property without prejudicing any rights with respect to the real property; or

As to both the personal property and the real property in accordance with the rights with respect to the real property, in which case the other provisions of this part do not apply.

Enforcement; fixtures.Subject to subsection (c) of this Code section, if a security agreement covers goods that are or become fixtures, a secured party may proceed:

Under this part; or

In accordance with the rights with respect to real property, in which case the other provisions of this part do not apply.

Removal of fixtures.Subject to the other provisions of this part, if a secured party holding a security interest in fixtures has priority over all owners and encumbrancers of the real property, the secured party, after default, may remove the collateral from the real property.

Injury caused by removal.A secured party that removes collateral shall promptly reimburse any encumbrancer or owner of the real property, other than the debtor, for the cost of repair of any physical injury caused by the removal. The secured party need not reimburse the encumbrancer or owner for any diminution in value of the real property caused by the absence of the goods removed or by any necessity of replacing them. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the secured party gives adequate assurance for the performance of the obligation to reimburse.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-604, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-605.
Unknown debtor or secondary obligor.

A secured party does not owe a duty based on its status as secured party:

To a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows:

That the person is a debtor or obligor;

The identity of the person; and

How to communicate with the person; or

To a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:

That the person is a debtor; and

The identity of the person.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-605, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-606.
Time of default for agricultural lien.

For purposes of this part, a default occurs in connection with an agricultural lien at the time the secured party becomes entitled to enforce the lien in accordance with the statute under which it was created.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-606, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-607.
Collection and enforcement by secured party.

Collection and enforcement generally.If so agreed, and in any event after default, a secured party:

May notify an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral to make payment or otherwise render performance to or for the benefit of the secured party;

May take any proceeds to which the secured party is entitled under Code Section 11-9-315;

May enforce the obligations of an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral and exercise the rights of the debtor with respect to the obligation of the account debtor or other person obligated on collateral to make payment or otherwise render performance to the debtor and with respect to any property that secures the obligations of the account debtor or other person obligated on the collateral;

If it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-104, may apply the balance of the deposit account to the obligation secured by the deposit account; and

If it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control under paragraph (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-104, may instruct the bank to pay the balance of the deposit account to or for the benefit of the secured party.

Nonjudicial enforcement of mortgage.If necessary to enable a secured party to exercise under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section the right of a debtor to enforce a mortgage nonjudicially, the secured party may record in the office in which a record of the mortgage is recorded:

A copy of the security agreement that creates or provides for a security interest in the obligation secured by the mortgage; and

The secured party’s sworn affidavit in recordable form stating that:

A default has occurred with respect to the obligation secured by the mortgage; and

The secured party is entitled to enforce the mortgage nonjudicially.

Commercially reasonable collection and enforcement.A secured party shall proceed in a commercially reasonable manner if the secured party:

Undertakes to collect from or enforce an obligation of an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral; and

Is entitled to charge back uncollected collateral or otherwise to full or limited recourse against the debtor or a secondary obligor.

Expenses of collection and enforcement.A secured party may deduct from the collections made pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement, including reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party.

Duties to secured party not affected.This Code section does not determine whether an account debtor, bank, or other person obligated on collateral owes a duty to a secured party.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-607, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 17/SB 185.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, inserted “with respect to the obligation secured by the mortgage” in subparagraph (b)(2)(A).

11-9-608.
Application of proceeds of collection or enforcement; liability for deficiency and right to surplus.

Application of proceeds, surplus, and deficiency if obligation secured.If a security interest or agricultural lien secures payment or performance of an obligation, the following rules apply:

A secured party shall apply or pay over for application the cash proceeds of collection or enforcement under Code Section 11-9-607 in the following order to:

The reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party;

The satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or enforcement is made; and

The satisfaction of obligations secured by any subordinate security interest in or other lien on the collateral subject to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or enforcement is made if the secured party receives an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed;

If requested by a secured party, a holder of a subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of the interest or lien within a reasonable time. Unless the holder complies, the secured party need not comply with the holder’s demand under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection;

A secured party need not apply or pay over for application noncash proceeds of collection and enforcement under Code Section 11-9-607 unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable. A secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall do so in a commercially reasonable manner; and

A secured party shall account to and pay a debtor for any surplus, and the obligor is liable for any deficiency.

No surplus or deficiency in sales of certain rights to payment.If the underlying transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes, the debtor is not entitled to any surplus, and the obligor is not liable for any deficiency.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-608, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-609.
Secured party’s right to take possession after default.

Possession; rendering equipment unusable; disposition on debtor’s premises.After default, a secured party:

May take possession of the collateral; and

Without removal, may render equipment unusable and dispose of collateral on a debtor’s premises under Code Section 11-9-610.

Judicial and nonjudicial process.A secured party may proceed under subsection (a) of this Code section:

Pursuant to judicial process; or

Without judicial process, if it proceeds without breach of the peace.

Assembly of collateral.If so agreed, and in any event after default, a secured party may require the debtor to assemble the collateral and make it available to the secured party at a place to be designated by the secured party which is reasonably convenient to both parties.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-609, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-610.
Disposition of collateral after default.

Disposition after default.After default, a secured party may sell, lease, license, or otherwise dispose of any or all of the collateral in its present condition or following any commercially reasonable preparation or processing.

Commercially reasonable disposition.Every aspect of a disposition of collateral, including the method, manner, time, place, and other terms, must be commercially reasonable. If commercially reasonable, a secured party may dispose of collateral by public or private proceedings, by one or more contracts, as a unit or in parcels, and at any time and place and on any terms.

Purchase by secured party.A secured party may purchase collateral:

At a public disposition; or

At a private disposition only if the collateral is of a kind that is customarily sold on a recognized market or the subject of widely distributed standard price quotations.

Warranties on disposition.A contract for sale, lease, license, or other disposition includes the warranties relating to title, possession, quiet enjoyment, and the like which by operation of law accompany a voluntary disposition of property of the kind subject to the contract.

Disclaimer of warranties.A secured party may disclaim or modify warranties under subsection (d) of this Code section:

In a manner that would be effective to disclaim or modify the warranties in a voluntary disposition of property of the kind subject to the contract of disposition; or

By communicating to the purchaser a record evidencing the contract for disposition and including an express disclaimer or modification of the warranties.

Record sufficient to disclaim warranties.A record is sufficient to disclaim warranties under subsection (e) of this Code section if it indicates “There is no warranty relating to title, possession, quiet enjoyment, or the like in this disposition” or uses words of similar import.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-610, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

Section inapplicable to sales by court appointed receivers. —

Whenever sale of collateral is not by secured party, but by receiver appointed by court of equity, the former provisions were not applicable to the transaction. Sands v. Citizens & S. Nat'l Bank, 146 Ga. App. 853, 247 S.E.2d 544 (1978) (decided under former Code Section11-9-504).

Section inapplicable where debt extinguished as provided by instrument. —

Where the terms of the deed to secure debt allowed for early payment of the debt, by accepting grantor of deed’s payoff, the plaintiff simply allowed the debt evidenced by the deed to secure debt to be extinguished in a manner contemplated by that instrument, and that act does not constitute a disposition or sale of the collateral within the meaning of the former provisions. Griffith v. First Fed. Sav. Bank, 208 Ga. App. 863, 432 S.E.2d 606 (1993) (decided under former Code Section11-9-504).

Section inapplicable where no evidence of sale. —

Where neither the affidavits nor any other matter or pleading presented by the defendants identified any specific, probative evidence of a sale by the secured party, the former provisions of this section did not apply. Congress Fin. Corp. v. Commercial Technology, Inc., 910 F. Supp. 637 (N.D. Ga. 1995) (decided under former Code Section 11-9-504).

11-9-611.
Notification before disposition of collateral.

“Notification date.” As used in this Code section, the term “notification date” means the earlier of the date on which:

A secured party sends to the debtor and any secondary obligor an authenticated notification of disposition; or

The debtor and any secondary obligor waive the right to notification.

Notification of disposition required.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, a secured party that disposes of collateral under Code Section 11-9-610 shall send to the persons specified in subsection (c) of this Code section a reasonable authenticated notification of disposition.

Persons to be notified.To comply with subsection (b) of this Code section, the secured party shall send an authenticated notification of disposition to:

The debtor;

Any secondary obligor; and

If the collateral is other than consumer goods:

Any other person from which the secured party has received, before the notification date, an authenticated notification of a claim of an interest in the collateral;

Any other secured party or lienholder that, ten days before the notification date, held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement that:

Identified the collateral;

Was indexed under the debtor’s name as of that date; and

Was filed in the office in which to file a financing statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date; and

Any other secured party that, ten days before the notification date, held a security interest in the collateral perfected by compliance with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-311.

Subsection (b) of this Code section inapplicable; perishable collateral; recognized market.Subsection (b) of this Code section does not apply if the collateral is perishable or threatens to decline speedily in value or is of a type customarily sold on a recognized market.

Compliance with subparagraph (c)(3)(B) of this Code section.A secured party complies with the requirement for notification prescribed by subparagraph (c)(3)(B) of this Code section if:

Not later than 20 days or earlier than 30 days before the notification date, the secured party requests, in a commercially reasonable manner, information concerning financing statements indexed under the debtor’s name in the office indicated in subparagraph (c)(3)(B) of this Code section; and

Before the notification date, the secured party:

Did not receive a response to the request for information; or

Received a response to the request for information and sent an authenticated notification of disposition to each secured party or other lienholder named in that response whose financing statement covered the collateral.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-611, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

Section requires giving, not receipt, of reasonable notice. —

The former provisions required that seller give buyer reasonable notification of intended sale. However, requirement involved is one of creditor giving debtor reasonable notification as distinguished from debtor receiving such notification. Friddell v. Rawlins, 160 Ga. App. 44, 285 S.E.2d 779 (1981); Brewer v. Trust Co. Bank, 205 Ga. App. 891, 424 S.E.2d 74 (1992) (decided under former Code Section11-9-504).

Former subsection (3) held inapplicable. —

In a suit against the defendant as endorser of a note brought by a bank after it had exercised its power of sale on the residence of the insurer of the note, former subsection (3), relating to reasonable notification of sale, was inapplicable under the facts of the case. Breitzman v. Heritage Bank, 180 Ga. App. 171, 348 S.E.2d 713 (1986) (decided under former Code Section11-9-504).

Bank’s compliance with O.C.G.A. §10-1-36 notice requirements.

Evidence of a bank’s compliance with the notice requirements of
O.C.G.A. §10-1-36 was a sufficient showing of the bank’s compliance with the cumulative and additional “reasonable notification” provision of former subsection (3). Calcote v. Citizens & S. Nat'l Bank, 179 Ga. App. 132, 345 S.E.2d 616 (1986) (decided under former Code Section11-9-504).

Two attempts to deliver certified mail to the buyer’s correct address met the requirements of O.C.G.A. §10-1-36. Hill v. Federal Employees Credit Union, 193 Ga. App. 44, 386 S.E.2d 874 (1989) (decided under former Code Section11-9-504).

11-9-612.
Timeliness of notification before disposition of collateral.

Reasonable time is question of fact.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, whether a notification is sent within a reasonable time is a question of fact.

Ten-day period sufficient in nonconsumer transaction.In a transaction other than a consumer transaction, a notification of disposition sent after default and ten days or more before the earliest time of disposition set forth in the notification is sent within a reasonable time before the disposition.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-612, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-613.
Contents and form of notification before disposition of collateral; general.

Except in a consumer goods transaction, the following rules apply:

The contents of a notification of disposition are sufficient if the notification:

Describes the debtor and the secured party;

Describes the collateral that is the subject of the intended disposition;

States the method of intended disposition;

States that the debtor is entitled to an accounting of the unpaid indebtedness and states the charge, if any, for an accounting; and

States the time and place of a public disposition or the time after which any other disposition is to be made;

Whether the contents of a notification that lacks any of the information specified in paragraph (1) of this Code section are nevertheless sufficient is a question of fact;

The contents of a notification providing substantially the information specified in paragraph (1) of this Code section are sufficient, even if the notification includes:

Information not specified by that paragraph; or

Minor errors that are not seriously misleading;

A particular phrasing of the notification is not required; and

The following form of notification and the form appearing in paragraph (3) of Code Section 11-9-614, when completed, each provides sufficient information:

NOTIFICATION OF DISPOSITION OF COLLATERAL

Click to view

To: (Name of debtor, obligor, or other person to which the notification is sent) From: (Name, address, and telephone number of secured party) Name of Debtor(s): (Include only if debtor(s) is (are) not an addressee) (For a public disposition:) We will sell (or lease or license, as applicable) the to the highest qualified bidder in public as follows: (describe collateral) Day and date: Time: Place: (For a private disposition:) We will sell (or lease or license, as applicable) the privately sometime after . (describe collateral) (day and date) You are entitled to an accounting of the unpaid indebtedness secured by the property that we intend to sell (or lease or license, as applicable) (for a charge of $). You may request an accounting by calling us at . (telephone number)

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-613, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-614.
Contents and form of notification before disposition of collateral; consumer goods transaction.

In a consumer goods transaction, the following rules apply:

A notification of disposition must provide the following information:

The information specified in paragraph (1) of Code Section 11-9-613;

A description of any liability for a deficiency of the person to which the notification is sent;

A telephone number from which the amount that must be paid to the secured party to redeem the collateral under Code Section 11-9-623 is available; and

A telephone number or mailing address from which additional information concerning the disposition and the obligation secured is available;

A particular phrasing of the notification is not required;

The following form of notification, when completed, provides sufficient information:

Click to view

A notification in the form of paragraph (3) of this Code section is sufficient, even if additional information appears at the end of the form;

A notification in the form of paragraph (3) of this Code section is sufficient, even if it includes errors in information not required by paragraph (1) of this Code section, unless the error is misleading with respect to rights arising under this article; and

If a notification under this Code section is not in the form of paragraph (3) of this Code section, law other than this article determines the effect of including information not required by paragraph (1) of this Code section.

(Name and address of secured party) (Date)
NOTICE OF OUR PLAN TO SELL PROPERTY (Name and address of any obligor who is also a debtor) Subject: (Identification of transaction) We have your , because you broke promises in our agreement. (describe collateral) (For a public disposition:) We will sell at public sale. A sale could include a lease or license. The sale will be held as follows: (describe collateral) Date: Time: Place: You may attend the sale and bring bidders if you want. (For a private disposition:) We will sell at private sale sometime after . A sale could include a lease or license. (describe collateral) (date) The money that we get from the sale (after paying our costs) will reduce the amount you owe. If we get less money than you owe, you still owe us the difference. If we get more money than you owe, you will get the extra money, unless we must pay it to someone else. (will or will not, as applicable) You can get the property back at any time before we sell it by paying us the full amount you owe (not just the past due payments), including our expenses. To learn the exact amount you must pay, call us at . (telephone number) If you want us to explain to you in writing how we have figured the amount that you owe us, you may call us at or write us at and request a written explanation. (We will charge you $ for the explanation if we sent you another written explanation of the amount you owe us within the last six months.) (telephone number) (secured party’s address) If you need more information about the sale call us at or write us at . (telephone number) (secured party’s address) We are sending this notice to the following other people who have an interest in or who owe money under your agreement: (describe collateral) ; (Names of all other debtors and obligors, if any)

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-614, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-615.
Application of proceeds of disposition; liability for deficiency and right to surplus.

Application of proceeds.A secured party shall apply or pay over for application the cash proceeds of a disposition under Code Section 11-9-610 in the following order to:

The reasonable expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for disposition, processing, and disposing, and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party;

The satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made;

The satisfaction of obligations secured by any subordinate security interest in or other subordinate lien on the collateral if:

The secured party receives from the holder of the subordinate security interest or other lien an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed; and

In a case in which a consignor has an interest in the collateral, the subordinate security interest or other lien is senior to the interest of the consignor; and

A secured party that is a consignor of the collateral if the secured party receives from the consignor an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed.

Proof of subordinate interest.If requested by a secured party, a holder of a subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of the interest or lien within a reasonable time. Unless the holder does so, the secured party need not comply with the holder’s demand under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

Application of noncash proceeds.A secured party need not apply or pay over for application noncash proceeds of a disposition under Code Section 11-9-610 unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable. A secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall do so in a commercially reasonable manner.

Surplus or deficiency if obligation secured.If the security interest under which a disposition is made secures payment or performance of an obligation, after making the payments and applications required by subsection (a) of this Code section and permitted by subsection (c) of this Code section:

Unless paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section requires the secured party to apply or pay over cash proceeds to a consignor, the secured party shall account to and pay a debtor for any surplus; and

The obligor is liable for any deficiency.

No surplus or deficiency in sales of certain rights to payment.If the underlying transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes:

The debtor is not entitled to any surplus; and

The obligor is not liable for any deficiency.

Calculation of surplus or deficiency in disposition to person related to secured party.The surplus or deficiency following a disposition is calculated based on the amount of proceeds that would have been realized in a disposition complying with this part to a transferee other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor if:

The transferee in the disposition is the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor; and

The amount of proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of proceeds that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.

Cash proceeds received by junior secured party.A secured party that receives cash proceeds of a disposition in good faith and without knowledge that the receipt violates the rights of the holder of a security interest or other lien that is not subordinate to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made:

Takes the cash proceeds free of the security interest or other lien;

Is not obligated to apply the proceeds of the disposition to the satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or other lien; and

Is not obligated to account to or pay the holder of the security interest or other lien for any surplus.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-615, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-616.
Explanation of calculation of surplus or deficiency.

Definitions.As used in this Code section, the term:

“Explanation” means a writing that:

States the amount of the surplus or deficiency;

Provides an explanation in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section of how the secured party calculated the surplus or deficiency;

States, if applicable, that future debits, credits, charges, including additional credit service charges or interest, rebates, and expenses may affect the amount of the surplus or deficiency; and

Provides a telephone number or mailing address from which additional information concerning the transaction is available.

“Request” means a record:

Authenticated by a debtor or consumer obligor;

Requesting that the recipient provide an explanation; and

Sent after disposition of the collateral under Code Section 11-9-610.

Explanation of calculation.In a consumer goods transaction in which the debtor is entitled to a surplus or a consumer obligor is liable for a deficiency under Code Section 11-9-615, the secured party shall:

Send an explanation to the debtor or consumer obligor, as applicable, after the disposition and:

Before or when the secured party accounts to the debtor and pays any surplus or first makes written demand on the consumer obligor after the disposition for payment of the deficiency; and

Within 14 days after receipt of a request; or

In the case of a consumer obligor who is liable for a deficiency, within 14 days after receipt of a request, send to the consumer obligor a record waiving the secured party’s right to a deficiency.

Required information.To comply with subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of this Code section, a writing must provide the following information in the following order:

The aggregate amount of obligations secured by the security interest under which the disposition was made, and, if the amount reflects a rebate of unearned interest or credit service charge, an indication of that fact, calculated as of a specified date:

If the secured party takes or receives possession of the collateral after default, not more than 35 days before the secured party takes or receives possession; or

If the secured party takes or receives possession of the collateral before default or does not take possession of the collateral, not more than 35 days before the disposition;

The amount of proceeds of the disposition;

The aggregate amount of the obligations after deducting the amount of proceeds;

The amount, in the aggregate or by type, and types of expenses, including expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for disposition, processing, and disposing of the collateral, and attorney’s fees secured by the collateral which are known to the secured party and relate to the current disposition;

The amount, in the aggregate or by type, and types of credits, including rebates of interest or credit service charges, to which the obligor is known to be entitled and which are not reflected in the amount in paragraph (1) of this subsection; and

The amount of the surplus or deficiency.

Substantial compliance.A particular phrasing of the explanation is not required. An explanation complying substantially with the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section is sufficient, even if it includes minor errors that are not seriously misleading.

Charges for responses.A debtor or consumer obligor is entitled without charge to one response to a request under this Code section during any six-month period in which the secured party did not send to the debtor or consumer obligor an explanation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section. The secured party may require payment of a charge not exceeding $10.00 for each additional response.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-616, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-617.
Rights of transferee of collateral.

Effects of disposition.A secured party’s disposition of collateral after default:

Transfers to a transferee for value all of the debtor’s rights in the collateral;

Discharges the security interest under which the disposition is made; and

Discharges any subordinate security interest or other subordinate lien.

Rights of good faith transferee.A transferee that acts in good faith takes free of the rights and interests described in subsection (a) of this Code section, even if the secured party fails to comply with this article or the requirements of any judicial proceeding.

Rights of other transferee.If a transferee does not take free of the rights and interests described in subsection (a) of this Code section, the transferee takes the collateral subject to:

The debtor’s rights in the collateral;

The security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made; and

Any other security interest or other lien.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-617, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-618.
Rights and duties of certain secondary obligors.

Rights and duties of secondary obligor.A secondary obligor acquires the rights and becomes obligated to perform the duties of the secured party after the secondary obligor:

Receives an assignment of a secured obligation from the secured party;

Receives a transfer of collateral from the secured party and agrees to accept the rights and assume the duties of the secured party; or

Is subrogated to the rights of a secured party with respect to collateral.

Effect of assignment, transfer, or subrogation.An assignment, transfer, or subrogation described in subsection (a) of this Code section:

Is not a disposition of collateral under Code Section 11-9-610; and

Relieves the secured party of further duties under this article.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-618, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-619.
Transfer of record or legal title.

“Transfer statement.” As used in this Code section, the term “transfer statement” means a record authenticated by a secured party stating:

That the debtor has defaulted in connection with an obligation secured by specified collateral;

That the secured party has exercised its postdefault remedies with respect to the collateral;

That, by reason of the exercise, a transferee has acquired the rights of the debtor in the collateral; and

The name and mailing address of the secured party, debtor, and transferee.

Effect of transfer statement.A transfer statement entitles the transferee to the transfer of record of all rights of the debtor in the collateral specified in the statement in any official filing, recording, registration, or certificate of title system covering the collateral. If a transfer statement is presented with the applicable fee and request form to the official or office responsible for maintaining the system, the official or office shall:

Accept the transfer statement;

Promptly amend its records to reflect the transfer; and

If applicable, issue a new appropriate certificate of title in the name of the transferee.

Transfer not a disposition; no relief of secured party’s duties.A transfer of the record or legal title to collateral to a secured party under subsection (b) of this Code section or otherwise is not of itself a disposition of collateral under this article and does not of itself relieve the secured party of its duties under this article.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-619, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.